Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1231
License; application; qualifications.

Each water well drilling supervisor, pump installation supervisor, natural resources ground water technician, and water well monitoring technician shall make application for a license in his or her respective trade. A license shall be issued to every applicant who successfully passes the examination for such license and otherwise complies with the Uniform Credentialing Act, the Water Well Standards and Contractors' Practice Act, and all standards, rules, and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such acts. Any individual employed by a licensed water well contractor or a licensed pump installation contractor who is not deemed to qualify as a licensed water well drilling supervisor or licensed pump installation supervisor may apply for a license in his or her respective trade in the same manner as the licensed water well drilling supervisor or the licensed pump installation supervisor. A supervisor holding a certificate of competence in his or her respective trade on December 1, 2008, shall be deemed to be licensed as a supervisor in such trade on such date. A technician holding a certificate of competence in his or her respective trade on December 1, 2008, shall be deemed to be licensed as a technician in such trade on such date.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 31;

Laws 1991, LB 51, § 22;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 123;

Laws 2001, LB 133, § 9;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1166.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.